src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-tuores_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - tuores: # Adjective 'fresh / tuore' - full paradigm
     tuores+A+Sg+Nom: tuores
     tuores+A+Sg+Gen: tuorehen
     tuores+A+Sg+Acc: [tuores, tuorehen]
     tuores+A+Sg+Par: tuorestu
     tuores+A+Sg+Tra: tuorehekse
     tuores+A+Sg+Abe: [tuoreheta, tuorehettah]
     tuores+A+Sg+Com: tuorehenke
     tuores+A+Sg+Ine: tuorehes
     tuores+A+Sg+Ela: [tuorehespäi, tuorehes]
     tuores+A+Sg+Ill: tuoreheh
     tuores+A+Sg+Ade: tuorehel
     tuores+A+Sg+Abl: [tuorehelpäi, tuorehel]
     tuores+A+Sg+All: tuorehele
     tuores+A+Sg+Ess: tuorehennu
     tuores+A+Sg+Ter: tuorehessah
     tuores+A+Sg+Apr: tuorehelluo
     tuores+A+Pl+Nom: tuorehet
     tuores+A+Pl+Gen: tuorehien
     tuores+A+Pl+Acc: tuorehet
     tuores+A+Pl+Par: tuorehii
     tuores+A+Pl+Tra: tuorehikse
     tuores+A+Pl+Abe: [tuorehita, tuorehittah]
     tuores+A+Pl+Com: tuorehienke
     tuores+A+Pl+Ine: tuorehis
     tuores+A+Pl+Ela: [tuorehispäi, tuorehis]
     tuores+A+Pl+Ill: tuorehih
     tuores+A+Pl+Ade: tuorehil
     tuores+A+Pl+Abl: [tuorehilpäi, tuorehil]
     tuores+A+Pl+All: tuorehile
     tuores+A+Pl+Ess: tuorehinnu
     tuores+A+Pl+Ins: tuorehin
     tuores+A+Pl+Apr: tuorehielluo
     tuores+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: tuoresgi
     tuores+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: tuorehengi
     tuores+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [tuoresgi, tuorehengi]
     tuores+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: tuorestugi
     tuores+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: tuoreheksegi
     tuores+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [tuorehetagi, tuorehettahgi]
     tuores+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: tuorehenkegi
     tuores+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: tuorehesgi
     tuores+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [tuorehespäigi, tuorehesgi]
     tuores+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: tuorehehgi
     tuores+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: tuorehelgi
     tuores+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [tuorehelpäigi, tuorehelgi]
     tuores+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: tuorehelegi
     tuores+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: tuorehennugi
     tuores+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: tuorehessahgi
     tuores+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: tuorehelluogi
     tuores+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: tuorehetgi
     tuores+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: tuorehiengi
     tuores+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: tuorehetgi
     tuores+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: tuorehiigi
     tuores+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: tuorehiksegi
     tuores+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [tuorehitagi, tuorehittahgi]
     tuores+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: tuorehienkegi
     tuores+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: tuorehisgi
     tuores+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [tuorehispäigi, tuorehisgi]
     tuores+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: tuorehihgi
     tuores+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: tuorehilgi
     tuores+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [tuorehilpäigi, tuorehilgi]
     tuores+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: tuorehilegi
     tuores+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: tuorehinnugi
     tuores+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: tuorehingi
     tuores+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: tuorehielluogi
